Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1319.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 301. Definitions.--Any reference in this article to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.), as amended to January 1, 1997, unless the reference contains the phrase "as amended" and refers to no other date, in which case the reference shall be to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 it exists as of the time of application of this article. The following words, terms and phrases when used in this article shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(o.6) "Qualified sports and fitness expenses" means as follows:(1) Amounts paid for the purpose of participating in a physical activity, including for membership at a fitness facility and for participation or instruction in physical exercise or physical activity.(2) The term does not include any amount paid for:(i) videos, books or similar materials;(ii) remote or virtual instruction in a physical exercise or physical activity, unless such instruction is live; or(iii) one-on-one personal training.(o.7) "Fitness facility" means a facility:(1) that provides instruction in a program of physical exercise, offers facilities for the preservation, maintenance, encouragement or development of physical fitness or serves as the site of a similar program of a state or local government;(2) that is not a private club owned and operated by the club's members;(3) that does not offer golf, hunting, sailing or riding facilities;(4) for which the facility's health or fitness component is not incidental to the facility's overall function and purpose; and(5) that is fully compliant with Federal and State anti-discrimination laws.20260SB1319PN1705 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 314.1. Physical Health Improvement Tax Credit.--(a) Except as provided under subsection (b), a resident individual taxpayer with a gross monthly household income at or below three hundred per cent of the Federal poverty limit may claim a credit against tax under this article equal to the amount of qualified sports and fitness expenses incurred by the resident taxpayer during a taxable year.(b) (1) For a resident individual taxpayer whose tax liability under this article is determined on a separate basis, the amount of tax credit under this section may not be more than five hundred dollars ($500).(2) For a resident individual taxpayer who filed a joint return with another resident individual taxpayer, the aggregate amount of tax credit under this section for the resident individual taxpayers who file the joint return may not be more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).(c) A tax credit under this section may not be refunded to a taxpayer and may not be carried forward or backward to other taxable years.(d) Nothing in this section shall require a fitness facility to track or share member activity data with a resident.(e) The department shall establish forms as necessary for the administration of this section.Section 3. This act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1319PN1705 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728